Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1238
Bridge commission; property; purchase authorized.

The bridge commission of a city of the metropolitan class is authorized to purchase in the State of Nebraska and in any adjoining state when authorized by such state or the government of the United States, if such authority be necessary, solely from funds provided under the authority of sections 14-1201 to 14-1252, such lands, structures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, or other interests in lands, including lands under water and riparian rights of any person, railroad, or other public or private corporation, necessary or convenient for the acquisition, construction, extension, or enlargement of such bridges and approaches to such bridges, upon such terms, prices, or consideration as may be considered by such bridge commission to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between such bridge commission and the owner or owners, title to such property to be taken in the name of and to vest in the city.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 16, p. 626;

C.S.1929, § 14-1216;

R.S.1943, § 14-1238;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 271.
July 21, 2022